Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,127
Nail technology activities; enumerated.

No person, group, company, limited liability company, or other entity shall engage in any of the following acts without being licensed as required by the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, unless specifically excepted by the act:

(1) Performing or advertising or holding oneself out as performing or qualified to perform any of the practices of nail technology;

(2) Teaching or advertising or holding oneself out as teaching or qualified to teach any of the practices of nail technology; or

(3) Operating or advertising or holding oneself out as operating an establishment in which any of the practices of nail technology are performed or taught.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,181;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 389.